Missouri, session 2026, HB3360.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 208.159, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 208.159, to read as follows:
208.159. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 207.010, 208.152, and
208.153, the department of social services shall administer payments for nursing home
services authorized in sections 208.151, et seq., which govern medical assistance under Title
XIX, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the Federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 301
et seq.), as amended, and shall administer vendor payments for the aged and direct adult
services for the aged under Title XX, Public Law 93-647, 1974 amendments to the Federal
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1397 et seq.), as amended. The department shall, pursuant to
chapter 536, promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of administering such
payments, including rules to define the reasonable costs, manner, extent, quality, charges and
fees or payments for nursing home services.
2. The department of social services shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services of the federal Department of Health and Human Services for a
waiver or state plan amendment to implement a patient-driven payment model for MO
HealthNet payments for nursing home services provided by facilities that:
(1) Calculates payments for the following patient care services based on patients'
clinical characteristics rather than the volume of services provided:
(a) Physical therapy;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3360 2
(b) Occupational therapy;
(c) Speech-language pathology services; and
(d) Nontherapy ancillary services;
(2) Incorporates per diem add-on payments to improve the quality of care
delivered by facilities including, but not limited to:
(a) Incentive payments determined by facility performance on quality measures
specified by the department; and
(b) Payments based on the tenure, promotion, and training of certified nursing
assistants. Facilities shall use payments made under this paragraph to increase
compensation for certified nursing assistants; and
(3) Eliminates the mental illness diagnosis add-on approved by a previous state
plan amendment in which a facility receives a per diem adjustment if at least forty
percent of the facility's Medicaid participants have a diagnosis of schizophrenia or
bipolar disorder.
✔